Washington statutes.
RCW 10.88.230

Investigation of demand—Report.

When a demand shall be made upon the governor of this state by the executive authority of another state for the surrender of a person so charged with crime, the governor may call upon the attorney general or any prosecuting officer in this state to investigate or assist in investigating the demand, and to report to him or her the situation and circumstances of the person so demanded, and whether he or she ought to be surrendered.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1068; 1971 ex.s. c 46 s 4.]